Tennessee, session 114, SB0752.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-715(g), is amended by deleting
"two (2) calendar months" and substituting instead "sixty (60) calendar days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0752
001402
- 1 -